Vermont, session 2025-2026, S174.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. TREASURER STUDY OF GREEN BANK MODELS
(a) The Treasurer shall conduct a study of Green Bank models
implemented in other jurisdictions to determine whether and, if so, how
implementation of any elements of such models in Vermont would benefit the
State by facilitating and accelerating investment in climate mitigation
infrastructure, farming, and agriculture in a manner consistent with State goals
VT LEG #385940 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.174
2026 Page 2 of 3
and policies. The basis of this study shall reflect “recommendation five” in the
Treasurer’s Climate Infrastructure Financing Report of 2024. Accordingly, the
Treasurer shall consider the creation of a stand-alone financing entity, a Green
Bank, or the provision of Green Bank–like authority to one or more existing
State entities. As used in this section, “Green Bank” has the same meaning as
used in the above-referenced report and, in addition, also includes the
financing of farming and agricultural projects. Specifically, “Green Bank”
means an entity that functions like a loan or investment fund and that uses a
wide array of financial tools to support and accelerate the investment in
climate mitigation infrastructure, farming, and agriculture.
(b) In conducting the study required by this section, the Treasurer shall
seek input from the Vermont Public Finance Climate Collaborative; the
Vermont Climate Council; the Secretary of Natural Resources or designee; the
Commissioner of Public Service or designee; the Vermont members of the
Coalition for Green Capital; the Secretary of Agriculture, Food, and Markets or
designee; and any other public or private stakeholders deemed appropriate by
the Treasurer. In addition, the Treasurer shall establish a mechanism for
receiving written public comments and shall hold at least one public hearing on
the Treasurer’s draft findings and recommendations before they are finalized in
a report to the General Assembly as required in subsection (d) of this section.
VT LEG #385940 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.174
2026 Page 3 of 3
(c) In designing a structure or approach that would achieve the greatest
effectiveness in Vermont, the Treasurer shall consider the value created; the
possible trade-offs; potential risks; long-term sustainability; coordination
among existing State entities; the short- and long-term economic impact,
including with regard to funds retained or recirculated within the Vermont
economy; opportunities for maximizing the availability of public and private
funds; and any other considerations deemed appropriate by the Treasurer.
(d) The Treasurer shall submit the Treasurer’s findings and
recommendations, particularly with regard to specific recommended
implementation strategies, in a written report to the House Committees on
Energy and Digital Infrastructure; on Environment; and on Agriculture, Food
Resiliency, and Forestry and the Senate Committees on Finance, on Natural
Resources and Energy, and on Agriculture on or before December 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385940 v.3